Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
ARTICLE 6
LIQUOR ENFORCEMENT DIVISION AND
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY CASH FUND

Editor's note:

This article 6 was added with relocations in 2018. The former C.R.S. section number is shown in the editor's note following the section that was relocated.

Section

44-6-101. Liquor enforcement division and state licensing authority cash fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the liquor enforcement division and state licensing authority cash fund. The fund consists of money transferred in accordance with sections 44-3-502 (1), 44-4-105 (2), and 44-7-104.5 (6). The general assembly shall make annual appropriations from the fund for a portion of the direct and indirect costs of the liquor enforcement division and the state licensing authority in the administration and enforcement of articles 3 to 5 and 7 of this title 44. Any money remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year remains in the fund and does not revert to the general fund or any other fund. The fund shall be maintained in accordance with section 24-75-402.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1026), ch. 24, p. 280, § 2, effective October 1; entire section amended, (HB 18-1025), ch 152, p. 1079, § 11, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1001), ch. 302, p. 1517, § 16, effective July 14.